Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 6
HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR
PERSONS WITH MAJOR MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS

25.5-6-601. Short title.

The short title of this part 6 is the "Home- and Community-based Services for Persons with Major Mental Health Disorders Act".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1951, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 388, § 27, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-671 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-091, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-6-602. Legislative declaration - no entitlement created.

The general assembly finds and declares that the purpose of this part 6 is to provide, under federal authorization and subject to available appropriations, home- and community-based services for persons with major mental health disorders.

Nothing in this part 6 shall be construed to establish that eligible persons as defined in section 25.5-6-603 (1) are entitled to receive services from the state department or the department of human services. The provision of any services pursuant to this part 6 shall be subject to federal waiver authorization and available appropriations.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1951, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 388, § 28, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-672 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-091, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-6-603. Definitions.

As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible person" means a person:

Who has a primary diagnosis of a major mental health disorder, as such term is defined in the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders used by the mental health profession, and includes schizophrenic, paranoid, major affective, and schizoaffective disorders, and atypical psychosis, but does not include dementia diseases and related disabilities;

Who is in need of the level of care available in a nursing facility;

Who is categorically eligible for medical assistance, or whose gross income does not exceed three hundred percent of the current federal supplemental security income benefit level, and whose resources do not exceed the limit established for individuals receiving a mandatory minimum state supplementation of supplemental security income benefits or, in the case of a person who is married, do not exceed the amount authorized in section 25.5-6-101.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1951, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1330, § 209, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 644, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-673 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

(1) For additional definitions applicable to this part 6, see § 25.5-4-103.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

25.5-6-604. Cost of services.

Home- and community-based services for persons with major mental health disorders must meet aggregate federal waiver budget neutrality requirements.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1952, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 389, § 29, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-673.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-091, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-6-605. Relationship to single entry point for long-term care - repeal.

The home- and community-based services program for persons with major mental health disorders must not be considered a publicly funded long-term care program for the purposes of sections 25.5-6-105 to 25.5-6-107, concerning the single entry point system, unless and until the departments of health care policy and financing and human services provide in the memorandum of understanding between the departments for the inclusion of the program in the single entry point system.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1952, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 389, § 30, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(2) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354 §§ 69, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-674 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-091, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-6-606. Implementation of program for persons with mental health disorders authorized - federal waiver - duties of the department of health care policy and financing and the department of human services - rules.

The state department is authorized to seek any necessary waiver from the federal government to develop and implement a home- and community-based services program for persons with major mental health disorders. The program must be designed to provide home- and community-based services to eligible persons. Eligibility may be limited to persons who meet the level of services provided in a nursing facility, and services for eligible persons may be established in state board rules to the extent such eligibility criteria and services are authorized or required by federal waiver. The program must include services provided under the consumer-directed care service model, part 11 of this article 6.

The state department and the department of human services shall provide a system of reimbursement for services provided pursuant to this part 6 that encourages the most cost-effective provision of services.

The state department and the department of human services shall, subject to appropriation, use available federal, state, local, or private funds, including but not limited to medicaid funds available under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, to carry out the purposes of this part 6.

The state department may include in the memorandum of understanding with the department of human services provisions that allow the department of human services to certify agencies as medicaid providers for the purposes of this part 6, to adopt fiscal and administrative procedures, to review plans of care, to recommend reimbursement rates, to make recommendations regarding the scope, duration, and content of programs and the eligibility of persons for specific services provided pursuant to this part 6, and to fulfill any other responsibilities necessary to implement this part 6. However, the provisions shall be consistent with the designation of the state department as the single state agency in section 25.5-4-104.

The executive director and the state board shall promulgate such rules regarding this part 6 as are necessary to fulfill the obligations of the state department as the single state agency to administer medical assistance programs in accordance with Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

The department of human services shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to perform its function pursuant to this part 6. Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with section 24-4-103, C.R.S., and shall be consistent with the rules of the executive director and the state board.

In the event a direct conflict arises between the rules of the state department promulgated pursuant to subsection (5) of this section and the rules of the department of human services promulgated pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, regarding implementation of this part 6, the rules of the state department shall control.

No later than January 2024, the state department shall submit a report to the senate health and human services committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, and the house of representatives health and insurance committee, or any successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203. At a minimum, the report must identify:

A reimbursement system with a goal to incentivize and increase transportation provider participation;

How the state department will ensure compliance with applicable federal laws and waiver requirements;

A system of common reporting to ensure a recipient does not exceed the medicaid benefit in a multi-provider scenario; and

Best practices based on what other states have done to allow transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services, including but not limited to, reimbursement rates; driver compensation; and integration with programs that provide nonmedical transportation services.

In developing the report, the state department shall engage in a stakeholder process that includes individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families, individuals with disabilities, and transportation network companies. The report may be developed in conjunction with the reporting requirement in sections 25.5-6-307(6), 25.5-6-409 (6), 25.5-6-704 (8), and 25.5-6-1303 (9).

Upon completion of the report described in subsection (8)(a) of this section, the state department shall analyze and review each operational transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3). The state department shall verify each transportation network company's viability to ensure the health, safety, welfare, cost effectiveness, and capability in expanding nonmedical transportation services for individuals receiving services pursuant to this section and comply with all rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (8)(e)(I) of this section.

No later than July 1, 2024, the state department shall authorize verified transportation network companies to provide nonmedical transportation services if the state department finds the transportation network company viable under federal requirements and within budgetary constraints.

For the purposes of this subsection (8)(c), "verify" means a transportation network company meets all requirements resulting from the report described in subsection (8)(a) of this section.

The state department may seek any necessary federal authorization for the implementation of this subsection (8).

The state department shall promulgate any necessary rules to ensure transportation network companies comply with federal and state oversight requirements and shall include all relevant stakeholders, including medicaid recipients, transportation network companies, current providers and drivers for nonmedical transportation services, and other interested parties in the development of such requirements.

Pursuant to section 40-10.1-105 (1)(l), transportation network companies are not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission when providing nonmedical transportation services pursuant to this section and are instead subject to rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to this subsection (8)(e).

This subsection (8) does not apply to a provider authorized to provide transportation services pursuant to part 8 of article 1 of title 25.5 prior to August 10, 2022.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1952, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 389, § 31, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(8) added, (HB 22-1114), ch. 396, p. 2818, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-675 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-091, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1114, see section 1 of chapter 396, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-6-607. Implementation of part contingent upon receipt of federal waiver - repeal of part.

The implementation of this part 6 is conditioned upon the issuance of necessary waivers by the federal government and available appropriations. The provisions of this part 6 shall be implemented to the extent authorized by federal waiver. The state department shall propose legislation that conforms with the waiver provisions no later than the next regular legislative session following the issuance of the waiver.

Provisions of this part 6 that are approved by the federal government and are authorized by federal waiver shall remain in effect only for so long as specified in the federal waiver, unless otherwise extended by the federal government. The state department shall provide written notice to the revisor of statutes of the final termination date of the waiver, and this part 6 shall be repealed, effective July 1 of the year in which the waiver is terminated.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1953, § 7, effective July 1.